Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-1450
Act, how cited.

Sections 76-1450 to 76-14,111 shall be known and may be cited as the Mobile Home Landlord and Tenant Act.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 1;

Laws 2025, LB185, § 3.